Utah statutes.
19-6-702.   Legislative findings.
(1)  The Legislature finds millions of gallons of used oil are generated each
year in Utah, and this oil is:
(a)  a valuable petroleum resource that can be recycled; and
(b)  in spite of the potential for recycling, significant quantities of used
oil are wastefully disposed of or improperly used by means that pollute the
water, land, and air, and endanger the public health, safety, and welfare.
(2)  The Legislature finds used oil should be collected, treated, and reused
in a manner that conserves energy and does not present a hazard to public
health or the environment.
(3)  The Legislature finds in light of the harmful consequences that can
result from the improper disposal and use of used oil, and its value as a
resource, the collection, recycling, and reuse of used oil is in the public
interest.
